Nebraska, session 109, LB712A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB712A LB712A
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $12,600 from the General
Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $-0- from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to
the Department of Revenue, for Program 102, to aid in carrying out the
provisions of Legislative Bill 712, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First
Session, 2025.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
for state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this
section.
-2-